North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-17 Ginseng

4.1-17-01.
Ginseng — Rules — Certificates.

The agriculture commissioner may implement rules relating to the management and harvesting of ginseng, including the registration of persons buying or selling ginseng, the creation and maintenance of records, inspection requirements, and the issuance of any certificates or other documents required in accordance with state or federal law.

For purposes of this section, “ginseng” means Panax quinquefolius L. and includes ginseng seeds, tissue culture, live root, and dried root.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 71, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective August 1, 2015.